Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Area Planning

147.610.
Authority to establish area planning commission.

In any two (2) or more adjacent counties, one (1) of which has a city having a population of more than 50,000 and not more than 200,000 inhabitants as declared by the last federal census, the various cities and the counties may consolidate their planning operations by establishing an area planning commission which may be created under the provisions of KRS 147.610 to 147.705, when in the judgment of the legislative bodies of the cities and counties a consolidation provides for a more efficient planning operation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 248, § 1; 1968, ch. 152, § 110; 1974, ch. 308, § 30; 1982, ch. 253, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

147.620.
Procedure for establishment, alteration, or dissolution of commission.

If the fiscal courts of any two (2) or more adjacent counties elect to be consolidated as provided in KRS 147.610, and the respective legislative bodies of cities representing more than two-thirds (2/3) of the population of the residents living within the boundaries of corporate territories of each county, by ordinance or resolution elect to consolidate as provided in KRS 147.610, then the cities and counties so affected shall authorize the execution of a contract between themselves agreeing to participate in the creation of an area planning commission and agreeing to be governed by the provisions of KRS 147.610 to 147.705. When a sufficient number of municipalities and counties have executed said agreement, copies shall be filed in the office of the clerk of each of the counties affected. Thereupon an area planning commission is established. If at some later date the fiscal court and the legislative bodies of cities representing more than two-thirds (2/3) of the population of the residents living within the boundaries of the corporate territory of another adjacent county elect to join the area planning commission, then the cities and county so affected shall authorize the execution of a contract between themselves agreeing to participate and be governed by the provisions of KRS 147.610 to 147.705. The existing area planning council, as previously created under KRS 147.610 to 147.705 shall be empowered to execute an agreement accepting the new contract in behalf of the existing area planning council and commission. When such agreement is executed copies shall be filed in the office of the clerk of each of the counties affected. Thereupon the new area planning commission boundaries are established.

Any area planning commission created under the provisions of KRS 147.610 to 147.705 may be dissolved or altered in accordance with subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section.

An area planning commission may be altered or dissolved by the fiscal court, as follows:

Upon receipt of a petition and following a public hearing as provided herein, the fiscal court may alter the boundaries of an area planning commission by reducing its area, or may dissolve an area planning commission if that commission has for a period of two (2) consecutive years failed to provide the services for which it was established, or if all or a portion of such services have been provided by some other entity. The fiscal court of each member county of an area planning commission must vote to dissolve the commission before such dissolution may take effect.

Upon receipt of a petition signed by at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the number of registered voters who voted in the last presidential election, the fiscal court shall schedule a public hearing on the matter of alteration or dissolution and advertise such hearing as provided in KRS 424.130.

The petition shall be in substantially the following form:

At the hearing, the burden of proving that the commission is providing or taking substantial steps toward providing the services for which it was created, or that no other entity is providing the service, shall be upon the commission. In determining whether to alter, dissolve or to take no action in regard to the commission, the fiscal court shall consider testimony offered at the hearing and any other relevant information including but not limited to the following:

Present and projected need for the service provided by the commission;

Population density of the commission;

Existence of alternate providers of services;

Revenue base of the commission such as assessed valuation and bonding capacity; and

Consequences of alteration of the commission’s boundaries on the effectiveness and efficiency of the commission.

Within sixty (60) days following the hearing, the fiscal court shall set forth its written findings of fact in approving or disapproving the alteration or dissolution of the commission.

If the fiscal court determines to dissolve the commission, it shall determine a method to satisfy any legal obligations of the commission which might be affected thereby. Upon satisfaction of its legal obligations, the commission shall be legally dissolved; any special ad valorem tax imposed by the commission shall be removed from the tax rolls by the county clerk; and any assets of the commission shall be assumed by the county.

If the fiscal court determines to alter the boundaries of the commission, it shall draw the new boundaries of the commission and determine the proportional amount of existing legal obligations of the area which is to be excluded from the commission. Upon the satisfaction of such obligations, the new boundaries of the commission shall be legally effected and any affected taxpayer shall be removed from the tax rolls of the commission.

If the final decision of the fiscal court or the Circuit Court, in the case of an appeal as provided for herein, is against the alteration or dissolution of the commission, no attempt to alter or dissolve the commission pursuant to this section shall be made within three (3) years of the decision.

Any petitioner or member of the commission may, within thirty (30) days of the fiscal court’s decision, appeal an adverse finding of the fiscal court to the Circuit Court in the county containing the greater part of the commission. The Circuit Court shall review the decision of the fiscal court but shall reverse the decision only if such decision is found to be arbitrary or capricious. If the Circuit Court reverses the decision of the fiscal court by ordering the alteration or dissolution of the commission, it shall direct the fiscal court to determine, as provided in subsection (3)(e) of this section, a method for satisfying any legal obligations of the commission which might be affected thereby.

An area planning commission may be dissolved by a referendum as follows:

Persons seeking dissolution of the commission shall submit a petition to the county clerk signed by at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the number of registered voters who voted in the last presidential election.

The petition shall be in substantially the following form:

If the county clerk determines that the petition is in proper order, he shall certify the petition to the fiscal court. The fiscal court shall direct that the question be placed on the ballot at the next regular election if the question is submitted to the county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election. The fiscal court shall bear the costs of advertising and placing the question on the ballot.

The county clerk shall advertise the question as provided in KRS Chapter 424 and shall prepare the question for the ballot. The ballot shall contain the following admonition to the voter: “The (name of the area planning commission) may have existing legal obligations which must be satisfied before the commission can be dissolved. The citizens residing within the area planning commission territory shall be responsible for the satisfaction of any obligations.” The question of the dissolution of the commission shall be placed on the ballot in substantially the following form:

All registered voters shall be eligible to vote on the question of dissolution.

In referendums under this section, provision shall be made for those opposing the dissolution of the commission to have equal representation with the proponents of the measure in the determination of eligibility of voters, and in the observance of canvassing and certifying of the returns.

If a majority of those voting in the referendum as provided for herein, favor the dissolution of the commission, the commission shall, upon satisfaction of its legal obligations, be dissolved by the order of the fiscal court, any special ad valorem tax imposed by the commission shall be removed from the tax rolls by the county clerk and any assets of the commission shall be assumed by the county.

If a majority of those voting in the referendum oppose the dissolution of the commission, no attempt to dissolve the commission pursuant to this section shall be made within five (5) years of the election.

Each member county of an area planning commission must follow the procedures defined herein, before such dissolution may take effect.

Any member county of an area planning commission may withdraw its membership after following the procedures defined herein. The commission shall continue to function after such withdrawals, with its boundaries consisting of the remaining county members. No county may withdraw from any commission unless it satisfies its part of all contractual obligations assumed by the commission prior to the passage of its resolution.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed as prohibiting any county, which is included in the territory of an area planning commission, from withdrawing that county’s membership in an area planning commission, provided that the procedures for effectuating such withdrawal shall be in accordance with either subsection (3) or (4) of this section.

“The undersigned registered voters as determined by subsection (3)(b) of this section living within the area planning commission territory (and containing a description of the territory) hereby request that the fiscal court consider the alteration or dissolution of the area planning commission pursuant to this section.” The petition shall conspicuously state in laymen’s terms that any legal obligations of the commission must be satisfied before the commission can be dissolved and that the citizens residing within the area planning commission territory shall be responsible for the satisfaction of any obligations. Signatures on the petition shall be dated, the last no later than ninety (90) days after the first.

Click to view

“The undersigned registered voters as determined by subsection (4)(a) of this section, living within the area planning commission territory (and containing a description of the territory) hereby request that the question of the dissolution of the commission be put to a referendum.” The petition shall conspicuously state in laymen’s terms that any legal obligations of the commission must be satisfied before the commission can be dissolved and that citizens residing within the area planning commission territory shall be responsible for the satisfaction of any such obligations. Signatures on the petition shall be dated, the last no later than ninety (90) days after the first.

Click to view

“The (name of the area planning commission and containing a description of the commission’s territory) should be dissolved.” The voter shall vote “yes” or “no.”

Click to view

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 248, § 2; 1974, ch. 359, § 5; 1982, ch. 253, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 195, § 55, effective July 15, 1996.

147.630.
Commission membership — Officers — Quorum — Meetings.

The area planning commission as created under the provisions of KRS 147.610 to 147.705 shall be composed of not more than nine (9) members who shall be selected from governmental units participating in the existence of the area planning commission by the affirmative action of the area council hereinafter provided for.

Of the initial membership five (5) members shall be elected for a term of two (2) years, and four (4) members for a term of one (1) year each, and upon the expiration of their respective terms the successors of each shall be elected for a term of two (2) years.

At its first regular meeting in each year, the commission shall elect from its membership a chairman and a vice chairman. The vice chairman shall have the authority to act as the chairman during the absence of its chairman.

The commission may appoint from within or without its own membership a secretary, prescribe his duties and fix his compensation.

Members of the commission may be removed for cause by an affirmative action of the area council.

Vacancies may be filled at any time by the affirmative action of the area council for the unexpired term existing.

Each member of the commission, before entering upon his official duties, shall take and subscribe to an oath that he will honestly, faithfully, and impartially perform the duties of his office, and that he will not be interested in any contract let for the purpose of carrying out any of the provisions of KRS 147.610 to 147.705. The oath shall be filed with the county clerk in the county of his residence.

Each member of the commission shall give a good and sufficient bond, to be approved by the area council, conditioned upon the faithful and honest performance of his duties, and as security for all moneys coming into his hands or under his control. The cost of the bond shall be paid by the commission.

A quorum shall consist of a majority of the members of the commission.

The commission shall appoint a treasurer from within or without its membership, prescribe his duties and fix his compensation. The treasurer shall execute a good and sufficient bond, conditioned upon the faithful and honest performance of his duties and as security for all moneys coming into his hands or under his control. Said bond shall be in the penal sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The cost of the bond shall be paid by the commission.

Meetings shall be held at the call of the chairman.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 248, § 3, effective June 16, 1960; 1978, ch. 384, § 286, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 353, § 3, effective July 15, 1982.

147.635.
Budget — Annual audit — Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

An area planning commission created under the provisions of KRS 147.610 to 147.705 shall, not later than two (2) months prior to the first day of its fiscal year, submit a proposed budget detailing anticipated revenues and expenditures, and a proposed tax rate, to the area council for its approval on or before the first day of each such fiscal year.

The area council shall contract with an independent, reputable certified public accountant to perform an audit of the records, books, and accounts of the area planning commission for each fiscal year.

The area planning commission and area council shall comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 359, § 6; 1982, ch. 253, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 2013, ch. 40, § 54, effective March 21, 2013.

147.640.
Area council — Membership — Relation to commission.

In order to provide more effective representation of the various governmental units participating in the creation of the area planning commission, an area council shall be created.

The area council shall be composed of one (1) representative and one (1) alternate from each municipality and county within the area planning territory. Each such representative and alternate shall be appointed annually in the manner prescribed by law respecting appointments by such city or county.

Only elected officials of each respective jurisdiction shall be eligible for appointment to the area planning council.

At its first regular meeting in each year, the council shall elect from its membership a president and vice president. The vice president shall have the authority to act as president of the council during the absence or disability of the president.

The council may appoint from within or without its own membership a secretary, prescribe his duties and fix his compensation.

The council shall act in a supervisory and advisory capacity with the area planning commission created hereunder. All actions taken by the council must receive the affirmative vote of the following, if in attendance: two (2) counties or two (2) cities with a population equal to or greater than fifteen thousand (15,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census or one (1) county and one (1) city with a population equal to or greater than fifteen thousand (15,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census and a majority of the remaining membership in attendance for passage.

The area council may budget in each year for the payment of a per diem for each member of the area planning commission not to exceed in any one (1) year the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each member.

A quorum of the area council shall consist of a majority of its membership.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 248, § 4; 1974, ch. 359, § 1; 1982, ch. 253, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 2014, ch. 92, § 220, effective January 1, 2015.

147.650.
Effect on existing master plans — Local legislative body to state reasons for overriding recommendation of area planning commission. [Repealed.]

147.660.
Corporate character of commission — Power to levy tax and accept funds.

The area planning commission created hereunder, when accepted by the cities and counties affected as provided for herein, shall then be a political subdivision and shall be in perpetual existence, with power to sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with, incur liabilities and obligations, levy an annual tax, which shall not exceed more than five cents ($0.05) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of property within the counties affected, to be used for the purpose of defraying all expenses necessary and incidental to carry out the continuing activities of the area planning commission. This tax shall be certified to the auditors and county clerks of the various counties and by them to the respective treasurers of the counties, signator to the contract provided for in KRS 147.620. The tax shall be based upon the last preceding assessment for state and county purposes. Its collection shall be imposed upon all property within the counties participating and shall conform to the collection of taxes for counties and the same provisions concerning the nonpayment of taxes shall apply. The tax shall be added by the county clerk to the next state and county tax bill following the levy of the tax by the area planning commission, and shall be collected concurrently with state and county taxes. The sheriff shall be allowed a fee not to exceed four percent (4%) for collection.

In the performance of its duties, the area planning commission may cooperate with, contract with, or accept funds from federal, state, or local public or semipublic agencies, or private individuals or corporations within or without the Commonwealth, may expend such funds and may carry out such cooperative undertakings and contracts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 248, § 6; 1968, ch. 168, § 1.

147.670.
Additional powers and duties of commission.

The area planning commission shall have the power and duty to:

Prepare an area-wide comprehensive plan of the entire area within its jurisdiction, which includes all territory incorporated and unincorporated within the counties signator thereto. The area-wide comprehensive plan shall include at least all comprehensive plan elements and research requirements prescribed in KRS Chapter 100, so that the planning commissions of local planning units as established under KRS Chapter 100 and their respective legislative bodies, may adopt all or parts of said area-wide comprehensive plan, as it applies to their respective areas of jurisdiction, as a means of fulfilling the applicable requirements of KRS Chapter 100. This area-wide comprehensive plan shall be reviewed and amended, if necessary, at least once every five (5) years;

Appoint an executive director for the commission and fix his compensation. The director shall be qualified by training and experience in the field of planning and zoning;

Upon written request of a city or county within the territory of the area planning commission, the area planning commission’s staff may prepare and submit for consideration to the appropriate local planning unit, zoning ordinances based on the comprehensive plans of such local planning unit. The area planning commission staff assigned to perform such work shall consult with the appropriate local planning unit as established under KRS Chapter 100, the city or county legislative bodies, and all property owners who are directly affected by any change in the zoning ordinance applicable to such local planning unit;

Prescribe the qualifications of, appoint, remove, and fix the compensation of employees of the commission;

Prepare, publish, and distribute reports and other material relating to the business of the commission;

Prepare and submit an annual budget to the area planning council for the operation of the commission;

Exercise general supervision of and make regulations for the administration of the affairs of the commission;

Establish policies, procedures, and priorities for assigning staff and providing services to planning units established under the provision of KRS Chapter 100, their respective cities and counties, and other public and private agencies and organizations, and may, irrespective of KRS 147.675, enter into agreements with cities, counties, and other public agencies and organizations in accordance with the provisions of KRS 65.210 to 65.300 for the administration of KRS 65.8801 to 65.8839 and KRS Chapters 99, 99A, 100, and 198B; and

Keep an accurate and complete record of all commission proceedings, financial statements, and annually report to the various cities and counties signators to the agreement provided in KRS 147.620.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 248, § 7; 1968, ch. 168, § 2; 1982, ch. 253, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 106, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

147.673.
Application filing requirements when city or county located within territory of commission and planning unit — Hearing — Notice and publication — Review.

Where a city or county is located within the territory of an area planning commission and also within a planning unit established under the provisions of KRS Chapter 100, all applications for the adoption, revision, or amendment of any comprehensive plan, zoning ordinance, or subdivision regulation, shall be filed with the area planning commission. The area planning commission staff shall immediately notify the city or county involved, promptly forwarding the application to the appropriate local planning commission of the planning unit as established under the provisions of KRS Chapter 100, and request a public hearing be scheduled before said local planning commission. Such public hearing shall be scheduled to be held within forty-five (45) days of the date of receipt of the application by the area planning commission. The area planning commission may contract with any local planning commission of a planning unit, located within its territory, as established under the provisions of KRS Chapter 100, to provide the statutory notice and publication requirements for such public hearings, and any staff assistance necessary to conduct the public hearing before the local planning commission. In all cases, the area planning commission staff shall be required to review and make recommendations upon all such applications to the applicable local planning commission, and to the applicant, along with supporting information and comprehensive plan documentation, prior to or at the scheduled public hearing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 253, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

147.675.
Advisory capacity of area commission.

The provisions of KRS 147.610 through 147.705 shall be construed to confer on the area planning commission an advisory capacity only.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 359, § 3; 1982, ch. 253, § 8, effective July 15, 1982.

147.680.
Prohibition of construction by public agency without commission’s review and recommendations.

No public agency shall construct or authorize the construction of any public facility, which is determined by the area planning commission to be of area-wide significance, within the area planning boundaries until and unless the proposed location and extent of such public construction or authorization shall have been reviewed and recommendations made to the appropriate public agency by the area planning commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 248, § 8; 1974, ch. 359, § 4; 1982, ch. 253, § 9, effective July 15, 1982.

147.690.
Hearing before adoption of master plan. [Repealed.]

147.700.
Adoption of master plan — Certification. [Repealed.]

147.705.
Information to be furnished to commission.

The legislative bodies of all counties forming the area planning commission, all cities, all special districts, planning and zoning commissions and boards of adjustment located therein, shall, after the final adoption, approval, or enactment of any annexation ordinance, subdivision plat, variance, zoning ordinance or resolution or subdivision regulation, furnish or cause to be furnished, within sixty (60) days after adoption or approval, a copy of same to the area planning commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 168, § 4; 1982, ch. 253, § 10, effective July 15, 1982.

147.710.
Appeal from commission’s ruling. [Repealed.]

147.990.
Penalty. [Repealed.]